Illinois, session 104th, HB4922.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 3. Findings. The General Assembly finds that: 5        (1) Beginning in Fiscal Year 2021, the State of 6    Illinois appropriated funds to support socially 7    disadvantaged farmers, recognizing persistent barriers to 8    land access, capital, infrastructure, and market 9    participation. 10        (2) A portion of those appropriations has remained 11    unexpended across multiple fiscal years, limiting the 12    intended impact of those funds. 13        (3) Emerging and socially disadvantaged farmers 14    continue to face systemic and structural barriers that 15    constrain agricultural production, business viability, and 16    participation in local and regional food systems. 17        (4) Deploying these unexpended funds through a 18    flexible, accessible grant program administered by the 19    Illinois Department of Agriculture will strengthen 20    Illinois' agricultural economy, advance equity, and 21    improve food security across urban, suburban, and rural 22    communities. 23    Section 5. The Department of Agriculture Law of the Civil   HB4922 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 17466 BDA 30892 b1Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 2205-455 as follows: 3    (20 ILCS 205/205-455 new)4    Sec. 205-455. Emerging and Socially Disadvantaged Farmers 5Infrastructure and Market Access Grant Program. 6    (a) In this Section:7    "Eligible applicant" means an emerging farmer, a socially 8disadvantaged farmer, or a farm entity primarily owned, 9controlled, or governed by one or more emerging or socially 10disadvantaged farmers and operating or proposing to operate 11within Illinois.12    "Emerging farmer" means a farmer or aspiring farmer who is 13a member of or represents one or more of the following groups:14        (1) women;15        (2) veterans;16        (3) persons with disabilities;17        (4) American Indian or Alaska Native persons;18        (5) members of communities of color;19        (6) young persons;20        (7) lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, 21    intersex, or asexual (LGBTQIA+) persons;22        (8) urban farmers; or23        (9) any other emerging farmers as determined by the 24    Director to further the purposes of this Section.25    "Infrastructure" means facilities, improvements, and   HB4922 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 17466 BDA 30892 b1systems necessary for agricultural production and market 2access, including land preparation, on-farm utilities, 3post-harvest handling, processing, storage, aggregation, and 4distribution.5    "Social disadvantage" means diminished opportunity and 6disproportionate barriers to entering, operating, sustaining, 7or expanding a farm business that are reasonably linked to 8such discrimination and not solely attributable to individual 9business decisions.10    "Socially disadvantaged farmer" means an individual farmer 11or aspiring farmer who has experienced, or whose farming 12operation has experienced, social disadvantage as a result of 13systemic or chronic discrimination or bias in access to land, 14credit, capital, insurance, technical assistance, education, 15training, markets, or participation in public or private 16agricultural programs, on the basis of one or more of the 17following actual or perceived characteristics: race, color, 18ethnicity, national origin, ancestry, sex, pregnancy or 19childbirth-related status, sexual orientation, gender identity 20or expression, religion, age, disability, marital or familial 21status, or immigration or citizenship status.22    (b) The Department shall establish and administer the 23Emerging and Socially Disadvantaged Farmers Infrastructure and 24Market Access Grant Program to provide grants to eligible 25applicants for the purpose of increasing agricultural 26production, strengthening farm viability, and expanding access   HB4922 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 17466 BDA 30892 b1to markets within the State.2    (c) This Program is subject to appropriation, which may 3include appropriations equivalent to the amounts that were 4appropriated but not expended in Fiscal Years 2021, 2022, 52023, 2024, and 2025 for emerging or socially disadvantaged 6farmers.7    (d) Grant funds may be used for, but are not limited to:8        (1) capital and infrastructure improvements;9        (2) equipment and supply purchases;10        (3) operational and working capital expenses; and11        (4) market access, aggregation, transportation, and 12    distribution expenses.13    (e) The Department shall establish grant award tiers and 14shall not require matching funds. Priority shall be given to 15applicants who:16        (1) have not previously received State agricultural 17    grants;18        (2) operate small-scale or limited-resource farm 19    operations;20        (3) demonstrate barriers consistent with the 21    definition of socially disadvantaged farmer; and22        (4) propose projects that increase food production, 23    create jobs, or expand access to Illinois-grown products.24    (f) The Department shall adopt rules to implement and 25administer this Section. These rules may allow eligibility 26verification through self-attestation or other reasonable   HB4922 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 17466 BDA 30892 b1methods.2    (g) The Department shall submit an annual report to the 3General Assembly detailing grant awards, expenditures, and 4program outcomes. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 62026.